el: Σχεδιασμός διαχυτήρα: Beauty dish; Bounce; Θολωτή; Flash bender; Honeycomb; Δακτύλιος; Snoot; Softbox; Με ομπρέλα; Άλλο
ko: 디퓨저 디자인: 뷰티 디쉬; 바운스; 돔; 플래시 밴더; 벌집; 반지; 스누트; 소프트박스; 우산; 기타
th: การออกแบบดิฟฟิวเซอร์: จานกระจายแสง; สะท้อน; โดม; ตัวเบี่ยงแสงแฟลช; รังผึ้ง; แหวน; สนูต; ซอฟต์บ็อกซ์; ร่ม; อื่นๆ
it: Design del diffusore: Beauty dish; Rimbalzo; Cupola; Piegatore flash; Honeycomb; Anello; Cannocchiale; Softbox; Ombrellini; Altro
hu: Diffúzor kialakítása: Beauty Dish; Bounce; Kupola alakú; FlashBender; Méhsejt alakú; Gyűrű alakú; Kúp alakú; Softbox; Esernyő; Egyéb
tr: Difüzör tasarımı: Portre çanağı; Sıçrama; Kubbe; Flaş bükücü; Bal peteği; Yüzük; Snoot; Softbox; Şemsiye; Diğer
cs: Konstrukce difuzoru: Kosmetická miska; Odrazový; Kupole; Modifikátor osvětlení; Honeycomb; Prsten; Snoot; Softbox; Deštníček; Jiné
ro-RO: Design difuzor: Beauty dish; Bounce; Dome; Flash bender; Fagure; Inel; Snoot; Softbox; Umbrelă; Altele
pl: Konstrukcja dyfuzora: Beauty dish; Blenda; Kopuła; Modyfikator światła do lamp błyskowych; Plaster; Pierścień; Snoot; Softbox; Parasolka; Inne
ru: Конструкция рассеивателя: Портретная тарелка; Отражатель; Купол; Флэш-бендер; Соты; Кольцо; Снут; Софтбокс; Зонтик; Другая
vi: Thiết kế máy khuếch tán: Công cụ điều chỉnh ánh sáng Beauty dish; Nảy; Mái vòm; Máy đèn Flash bender; Honeycomb; Nhẫn; Bộ tạo hiệu ứng; Hộp làm mềm ánh sáng; Ô; Khác
ja: ディフューザーの種類: ビューティーディッシュ; バウンス型; ドーム; フラッシュベンダー; ハニカム; リング; スヌート; ソフトボックス; 折りたたみ; その他
sl-SI: Zasnova difuzorja: Lepotna posoda; Odboj; Kupolasta; Gibljiv; Satje; Obroč; Tulec; Softbox; Dežnik; Drugo
sk-SK: Dizajn difúzora: Reflektor Beauty dish; Reflektor Bounce; Reflektor Dome; Reflektor Flash bender; Reflektor Honeycomb; Reflektor Ring; Reflektor Snoot; Reflektor Softbox; Reflektor Umbrella; Iné
en: Diffuser design: Beauty dish; Bounce; Dome; Flash bender; Honeycomb; Ring; Snoot; Softbox; Umbrella; Other
pt-BR: Formato do difusor: Refletor de beleza; Difusor; Cúpula; Rebatedor de flash; Favo de mel; Anel; Cone snoot; Softbox; Guarda-chuva; Outro
sv: Diffusorutförande: Beauty dish; Bounce; Kupol; Flashbender; Honeycomb; Ring; Snoot; Bouncer; Paraply; Övrigt
es: Diseño del difusor: Beauty dish; Reflector; Cúpula; Flash bender; Panal; Anillo; Snoot; Softbox; Sombrilla; Otros
zh-CN: 扩散器设计: 雷达罩; 反射; 圆顶; 闪光灯反射板; 蜂窝; 戒指; 束光筒; 柔光箱; 伞; 其他
hr-HR: Dizajn difuzora: Beauty Dish; Odbijanje; Kupola; Flash Bender; Saće; Prsten; Snoot; Softbox; Kišobran; Ostalo
lt-LT: Difuzoriaus konstrukcija: „Beauty Dish“ apvalus šviesos skaidytuvas; Atšvaitas; Kupolo formos; Blykstės skaidytuvas; Korio formos; Žiedas; Taškinis; Šviesadėžė; Skėtis; Kita
da: Diffuserdesign: Skønhedsfad; Bounce; Kuppel; Flashbender; Honeycomb; Ring; Snoot; Softbox; Paraply; Andet
nb: Luftfukterdesign: Myklysreflektor; Sprette; Kuppel; Blitsbøyer; Bikake; Ring; Snute; Softbox; Paraply; Annet
de: Design des Diffusors: Beauty Dish; Bounce; Kuppel; Blitz-Bender; Honeycomb; Ring; Snoot; Softbox; Regenschirm; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 擴散器設計: 美人諜; 彈跳; 圓頂; 攝影反光板; 蜂巢; 戒指; 束光筒; 柔光箱; 傘; 其他
pt-PT: Design de difusor: Beauty dish; Bounce; Cúpula; Dobrador de flash; Honeycomb; Anel; Snoot; Softbox; Sombrinha; Outro
fi: Hajottimen muotoilu: Heijastinkupu; Heijastua; Kupoli; Salaman taittaja; Hunajakenno; Rengas; Varjostin; Tasovalo; Sateenvarjo; Muu
bg-BG: Дизайн на дифузер: Beauty dish; Отразяващ; Купол; Флаш бендер; Пчелна пита; Пръстен; Снут; Софтбокс; Чадър; Други
nl: Diffuserontwerp: Beauty dish; Bounce; Koepel; Flitsbuiger; Honingraat; Ring; Snoot; Softbox; Paraplu; Andere
fr: Conception du diffuseur: Beauty dish; Rebond; Dôme; Plieuse de flash; Honeycomb; Bague; Snoot; Boîte à lumière; Parapluie; Autre